California, session 20252026, SB333.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 3.83 (commencing with Section 7294.5) is added to Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read: CHAPTER 3.83. San Luis Obispo Council of Governments Transactions and Use Tax7294.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the San Luis Obispo Council of Governments, established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met: (1) The San Luis Obispo Council of Governments adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.(3) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is approved by the voters on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.(4) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique fiscal pressures in the County of San Luis Obispo.